ro-RO: Tip motor: Diesel; Electric; Gaz; Hibrid; Benzină; Rotativ; Supraalimentat; Cu turbosuflantă; Altele
es: Tipo de motor: Diésel; Eléctrico; Gas; Híbrido; Petróleo; Giratoria; Supercargado; Turboalimentación; Otros
sk-SK: Typ motora: Naftový; Elektrický; Plynový; Hybridný; Benzínový; Rotačný; Preplňovaný; Preplňovaný turbodúchadlom; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de motor: Gasóleo; Elétrico; Gás; Híbrido; Gasolina; Rotativo; Sobrecarregado; Com turbocompressor; Outro
pl: Typ silnika: ON; Elektryczny; Gazowy; Hybrydowy; Benzyna; Rotacyjny; Doładowanie; Turbosprężarka; Inne
tr: Motor Tipi: Dizel; Akülü; Gaz; Hibrit; Petrol; Döner; Süperşarjlı; Turboşarjlı; Diğer
nl: Motor type: Diesel; Elektrisch; Gas; Hybride; Benzine; Roterend; Extra geladen; Met turbocompressor; Andere
hr-HR: Vrsta motora: Dizel; Električni; Plinski; Hibridni; Benzin; Rotacijski; S puhalom; S turbopunjačem; Ostalo
hu: A motor típusa: Dízel; Elektromos; Gáz; Hibrid; Benzin; Forgó; Kompresszoros; Turbófeltöltésű; Egyéb
en: Engine type: Diesel; Electric; Gas; Hybrid; Petrol; Rotary; Supercharged; Turbocharged; Other
da: Motortype: Diesel; Elektrisk; Gas; Hybrid; Benzin; Roterende; Superladet; Turboladet; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta motorja: Dizel; Električni; Plinski; Hibridni; Bencinski; Krožni; Superpolnilnik; Turbopolnilnik; Drugo
el: Τύπος κινητήρα: Ντίζελ; Ηλεκτρικό; Αερίου; Υβριδικό; Πετρελαίου; Περιστροφικός; Με υπερτροφοδότηση; Με υπερπλήρωση; Άλλο
de: Motortyp: Diesel; Elektrisch; Gas; Hybrid; Benzin; Rotierend; Kompressor; Turbolader; Sonstiges
cs: Typ motoru: Motorová nafta; Elektrický; Plyn; Hybridní; Benzín; Rotační; Přeplňované; Turbomotor; Jiné
ru: Тип двигателя: Дизельный; Электрический; Газ; Гибридные; Бензиновый; Роторный; С наддувом; С турбонаддувом; Другой
pt-BR: Tipo de motor: Diesel; Elétrica; Gás; Híbrida; Gasolina; Rotativo; Supercompressor; Turbocompressor; Outro
lt-LT: Variklio tipas: Dyzelinis; Elektrinis; Dujinis; Hibridinė; Benzininis; Rotacinis; Su mechaniniu kompresoriumi; Su turbokompresoriumi; Kita
fi: Moottorityyppi: Diesel; Sähkö; Kaasu; Hybridi; Bensiini; Pyörivä; Ahdettu; Turboahdettu; Muu
zh-CN: 发动机类型: 柴油; 电动; 燃气; 混合型; 汽油; 旋转型; 机械增压方式; 涡轮增压; 其他
it: Tipo di motore: Diesel; Elettrico; Gas; Ibrido; Benzina; A rotazione; Sovralimentato; Turbocompresso; Altro
nb: Motortype: Diesel; Elektrisk; Gass; Hybrid; Bensin; Roterende; Superladet; Turboladet; Annet
sv: Motortyp: Diesel; Elektrisk; Bensin; Hybrid; Petroleum; Roterande; Överladdad; Turboladdad; Övrigt
zh-TW: 引擎類型: 柴油; 電動式; 瓦斯; 混合; 汽油; 旋轉; 增壓; 渦輪增壓; 其他
fr: Type de moteur: Diesel; Électrique; Gas; Hybrid; Essence; Rotatif; Suralimenté; Turbocompresseur; Autre
ja: エンジン型式: ディーゼル; 電気; ガス; ハイブリッド; ガソリン; ロータリー; 過給機装備; ターボチャージャー付き; その他
bg-BG: Тип двигател: Дизел; Електрически; Газ; Хибрид; Бензин; Ротационен; Суперзареден; Турбокомпресор; Други
vi: Loại động cơ: Diesel; Xe lăn điện; Ga; Ván kết hợp; Xăng dầu; Xoay; Siêu nạp; Tăng áp; Khác
th: ประเภทเครื่องยนต์: ดีเซล; ไฟฟ้า; แก๊ส; แบบไฮบริด; น้ำมันเบนซิน; โรตารี; ซูเปอร์ชาร์จ; เทอร์โบชาร์จ; อื่นๆ
ko: 엔진 유형: 디젤; 전자식; 가스; 하이브리드; 가솔린; 회전; 슈퍼차지; 터보차지; 기타